Nebraska, session 109, LB600.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB600 LB600
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 60-601, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
60-601 Sections 60-601 to 60-6,383 and sections 3 to 5, 7, and 9 to
18, of this act shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Rules of
the Road.
Sec. 2. Section 60-605, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
60-605 For purposes of the Nebraska Rules of the Road, the
definitions found in sections 60-606 to 60-676 and sections 3 to 5 of
this act shall be used.
Sec. 3. Highway work zone means a maintenance, repair, or
construction zone described in section 60-6,188.
Sec. 4. Speed control enforcement system means any photographic
device, radar device, laser device, or other electrical or mechanical
device that is designed to:
(1) Detect and record the speed of a motor vehicle; and
(2) Obtain a clear photograph or other recorded image of the rear
license plate of a motor vehicle when the speed of such motor vehicle
exceeds the maximum lawful speed limit.
Sec. 5. Speed control enforcement system operator means a person
who has been certified to operate a speed control enforcement system by
completing training offered by the manufacturer of such speed control
enforcement system. Such training shall include procedures for deploying,
testing, and operating such speed control enforcement system.
Sec. 6. Section 60-696, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-696 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
driver of any vehicle involved in an accident upon a public highway,
private road, or private drive, resulting in damage to property, shall
(a) immediately stop such vehicle at the scene of such accident and (b)
give his or her name, address, telephone number, and operator's license
-2-

LB600 LB600
2025 2025
number to the owner of the property struck or the driver or occupants of
any other vehicle involved in the collision.
(2) The driver of any vehicle involved in an accident upon a public
highway, private road, or private drive, resulting in damage to an
unattended vehicle or property, shall immediately stop such vehicle and
leave in a conspicuous place in or on the unattended vehicle or property
a written notice containing the information required by subsection (1) of
this section. In addition, such driver shall, without unnecessary delay,
report the collision, by telephone or otherwise, to an appropriate peace
officer.
(3)(a) A peace officer may remove or cause to be removed from a
roadway, without the consent of the driver or owner, any vehicle, cargo,
or other property which is obstructing the roadway creating or
aggravating an emergency situation or otherwise endangering the public
safety. Any vehicle, cargo, or other property obstructing a roadway shall
be removed by the most expeditious means available to clear the
obstruction, giving due regard to the protection of the property removed.
(b) This subsection does not apply if an accident results in or is
believed to involve the release of hazardous materials, hazardous
substances, or hazardous wastes, as those terms are defined in section
75-362.
(c) A peace officer and any person removing any vehicle, cargo, or
other property under this section shall not be held liable for any damage
caused to such vehicle, cargo, or other property.
(4) Any person violating subsection (1) or (2) of this section is
guilty of a Class II misdemeanor. If such person has had one or more
convictions under this section in the twelve years prior to the date of
the current conviction under this section, such person is guilty of a
Class I misdemeanor. As part of any sentence, suspended sentence, or
judgment of conviction under this section, the court may order the
defendant not to drive any motor vehicle for any purpose in the State of
-3-

LB600 LB600
2025 2025
Nebraska for a period of up to one year from the date ordered by the
court. If the court orders the defendant not to drive any motor vehicle
for any purpose in the State of Nebraska for a period of up to one year
from the date ordered by the court, the court shall also order that the
operator's license of such person be revoked for a like period.
Sec. 7. (1) The Department of Transportation or an agent of the
Department of Transportation may remove or cause to be removed from a
highway or the shoulder of a highway, without consent of the driver or
owner, any vehicle or other object that is:
(a) Located on such highway or such shoulder; and
(b) Impeding or could impede traffic on the highway.
(2) The Department of Transportation and any agent of the Department
of Transportation shall not be held liable for any damage caused to any
vehicle or other object that, under this section, is being removed from a
highway or the shoulder of a highway.
Sec. 8. Section 60-6,186, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-6,186 (1) Except when a special hazard exists that requires lower
speed for compliance with section 60-6,185, the limits set forth in this
section and sections 60-6,187, 60-6,188, 60-6,305, and 60-6,313 shall be
the maximum lawful speeds unless reduced pursuant to subsection (2) of
this section, and no person shall drive a vehicle on a highway at a speed
in excess of such maximum limits:
(a) Twenty-five miles per hour in any residential district;
(b) Twenty miles per hour in any business district;
(c) Fifty miles per hour upon any highway that is gravel or not
dustless surfaced;
(d) Fifty-five miles per hour upon any dustless-surfaced highway not
a part of the state highway system;
(e) Sixty-five miles per hour upon any four-lane divided highway not
a part of the state highway system;
-4-

LB600 LB600
2025 2025
(f) Sixty-five miles per hour upon any part of the state highway
system other than an expressway, a super-two highway, or a freeway;
(g) Seventy miles per hour upon an expressway or a super-two highway
that is part of the state highway system;
(h) Seventy miles per hour upon a freeway that is part of the state
highway system but not part of the National System of Interstate and
Defense Highways; and
(i) Seventy-five miles per hour upon the National System of
Interstate and Defense Highways, except that the maximum speed limit
shall be sixty-five miles per hour for:
(i) Any portion of the National System of Interstate and Defense
Highways located in Douglas County; and
(ii) That portion of the National System of Interstate and Defense
Highways designated as Interstate 180 in Lancaster County and Interstate
129 in Dakota County.
(2) The maximum speed limits established in subsection (1) of this
section may be reduced by the Department of Transportation or by local
authorities pursuant to section 60-6,188 or 60-6,190 or section 9 of this
act.
(3) The Department of Transportation and local authorities may erect
and maintain suitable signs along highways under their respective
jurisdictions in such number and at such locations as they deem necessary
to give adequate notice of the speed limits established pursuant to
subsection (1) or (2) of this section upon such highways.
Sec. 9. (1) The Department of Transportation may temporarily reduce
the maximum lawful speed for motor vehicles on any highway for any of the
following reasons:
(a) Any weather or environmental condition that reduces the
visibility of motor vehicle operators to approximately one-fourth of one
mile or less, including but not limited to fog, precipitation, smoke, or
dust;
-5-

LB600 LB600
2025 2025
(b) Any condition that could result in reduced motor vehicle
traction to the highway, including rain, water, ice, snow, oil, road
surface conditions, or any object on the highway;
(c) Any emergency situation; or
(d) Any traffic congestion, reduced traffic mobility, or reduced
traffic flow.
(2) Any reduction of the maximum lawful speed for motor vehicles on
a highway under subsection (1) of this section is only effective if the
Department of Transportation prominently displays an electronic or
digital sign with the following information along or above such highway:
(a) The reduced maximum lawful speed for motor vehicles on such
highway; and
(b) That the normal maximum lawful speed limit for such highway does
not apply until another electronic, digital, nonelectronic, or nondigital
sign indicates a return to the normal maximum lawful speed limit for such
highway.
(3) Any temporarily reduced maximum lawful speed limit under this
section shall be made in increments of five miles per hour.
(4) When the maximum lawful speed limit is temporarily reduced under
this section, there shall be no minimum speed limit for the corresponding
area of the temporarily reduced maximum lawful speed limit.
(5) The Department of Transportation shall:
(a) Develop and implement a policy for determining when to
temporarily reduce maximum lawful speed limits, what such speed limits
should be, and the increments to be used in reducing and reestablishing
the regular maximum lawful speed limit;
(b) Keep appropriate records that include when any maximum lawful
speed limit under this section has been changed, what such maximum lawful
speed limit was set at, and the reason for the change; and
(c) Keep appropriate records that include the maximum lawful speed
limit for each highway.
-6-

LB600 LB600
2025 2025
(6) The Department of Transportation may adopt and promulgate rules
and regulations to carry out this section.
Sec. 10. (1) The Department of Transportation may enforce any
violation of the maximum lawful speed limit for any school crossing zone
or highway work zone located on any highway by means of a speed control
enforcement system.
(2) Any local authority may enforce any violation of the maximum
lawful speed limit for any highway for any school crossing zone or
highway work zone located on any highway within the jurisdiction of such
local authority by means of a speed control enforcement system.
(3) The Department of Transportation or any local authority may
contract with any speed control enforcement system operator to operate
any such speed control enforcement system.
Sec. 11. (1)(a) The maximum lawful speed limit for a school
crossing zone shall only be enforced by means of a speed control
enforcement system if the school crossing zone warning lights are active
and there is signage displayed at the entry to the school crossing zone
that provides notice that a speed control enforcement system is or may be
in use.
(b) The maximum lawful speed limit for a highway work zone shall
only be enforced by means of a speed control enforcement system if there
is any worker present and there is signage displayed at the entry to the
highway work zone that provides notice that a speed control enforcement
system is or may be in use.
(2) A speed control enforcement system shall not record the speed of
a motor vehicle or an image of a motor vehicle unless the speed of the
motor vehicle detected by the speed control enforcement system:
(a) For a school crossing zone, exceeds six miles per hour over the
maximum lawful speed limit; or
(b) For a highway work zone, exceeds eleven miles per hour over the
maximum lawful speed limit.
-7-

LB600 LB600
2025 2025
Sec. 12. (1) For purposes of this section, owner:
(a) Includes a person who rents or is operating a vehicle owned by a
rental vehicle business; and
(b) Does not include any rental vehicle business.
(2) If a violation of the maximum lawful speed limit is enforced by
means of a speed control enforcement system, the registered owner of the
motor vehicle shall receive the following by electronic mail or first-
class mail:
(a) A copy of the photograph taken by the speed control enforcement
system;
(b) Information describing how to appeal such violation;
(c) Information describing how to pay the administrative fee charged
pursuant to section 14 of this act; and
(d)(i) For a second violation within three years, a citation for a
civil penalty of seventy-five dollars;
(ii) For a third or subsequent violation within five years, a
citation for a civil penalty of one hundred fifty dollars; and
(iii) For any other violation, a warning.
(3) For any violation of the maximum lawful speed limit that is
enforced by means of a speed control enforcement system, the Department
of Transportation or the local authority shall assess a civil penalty
against the registered owner of the motor vehicle that was issued a
citation under this section if such motor vehicle was:
(a) For a school crossing zone, exceeding the maximum lawful speed
limit by six miles per hour or more; or
(b) For a highway work zone, exceeding the maximum lawful speed
limit by eleven miles per hour or more.
(4) All civil penalties collected under this section shall be
remitted to the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with
Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.
Sec. 13. (1) For purposes of this section, owner:
-8-

LB600 LB600
2025 2025
(a) Includes a person who rents or is operating a vehicle owned by a
rental vehicle business; and
(b) Does not include any rental vehicle business.
(2) For any violation of the maximum lawful speed limit that is
enforced by means of a speed control enforcement system, there is a
rebuttable presumption that the registered owner of the motor vehicle was
operating the motor vehicle at the time of the violation.
(3) Any person that receives a warning or citation under section 12
of this act may request an administrative hearing to appeal such warning
or citation and to present evidence that such person:
(a) Was not operating the motor vehicle at the time of the
violation;
(b) Was not the registered owner of the motor vehicle in the
photograph included with the warning or citation; or
(c) Received a citation from a peace officer for the same occurrence
of a violation of the maximum lawful speed limit.
Sec. 14. (1) For any warning or citation issued under section 12 of
this act, an administrative fee may be charged and collected in an amount
reasonably based on the costs of carrying out the administrative duties
and operational costs for issuing the warning or citation.
(2) The Department of Transportation shall create a guidance
document that sets out the method to use to calculate such administrative
fee.
Sec. 15. (1) Any person who receives a citation issued by a peace
officer for a violation of the maximum lawful speed limit shall not be
liable for a civil penalty under section 12 of this act for the same
occurrence of a violation.
(2) Any person who receives a warning or citation under section 12
of this act shall not receive another warning or citation under section
12 of this act for the same occurrence of a violation.
Sec. 16. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,
-9-

LB600 LB600
2025 2025
any image or other data captured by a speed control enforcement system:
(a) Is confidential and shall not be a public record subject to
disclosure pursuant to sections 84-712 to 84-712.09; and
(b) Shall only be used by the Department of Transportation or local
authority for purposes of section 12 or 13 of this act.
(2) An image or other data captured by a speed control enforcement
system may be disclosed pursuant to an order from a court of competent
jurisdiction.
Sec. 17. A speed control enforcement system used to enforce the
maximum lawful speed limit shall receive an annual calibration check
performed by a calibration laboratory that is independent from the
Department of Transportation or any local authority. Any such calibration
check is only valid for purposes of this section if the calibration
laboratory that performed the calibration check issued a certificate of
calibration for such speed control enforcement system that certifies that
the calibration check was performed, the date of the calibration check,
and that the speed control enforcement system was accurately calibrated
as of such date.
Sec. 18. A speed control enforcement system shall be operated by a
speed control enforcement system operator. Such operator shall complete a
daily log for the speed control enforcement system that contains the
following:
(1) The location where the speed control enforcement system is
deployed;
(2) The date and time of the deployment;
(3) For school crossing zones, the status of whether the school
crossing zone warning lights were operating during the operation of the
speed control enforcement system; and
(4) For highway work zones, whether any worker was present, and if
so, the approximate location of each such worker within the highway work
zone.
-10-

LB600 LB600
2025 2025
Sec. 19. Section 60-6,378, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-6,378 (1)(a) A driver in a vehicle on a controlled-access highway
approaching or passing a stopped motor vehicle that authorized emergency
vehicle or road assistance vehicle which makes use of proper audible or
visual signals shall proceed with due care and caution as described in
subdivision (b) of this subsection.
(b) On a controlled-access highway with at least two adjacent lanes
of travel in the same direction on the same side of the highway where a
stopped motor authorized emergency vehicle or road assistance vehicle is
using proper audible or visual signals, the driver of the vehicle shall
proceed with due care and caution and yield the right-of-way by moving
into a lane at least one moving lane apart from the stopped motor
authorized emergency vehicle or road assistance vehicle unless directed
otherwise by a peace officer or other authorized emergency personnel. If
moving into another lane is not possible because of weather conditions,
road conditions, or the immediate presence of vehicular or pedestrian
traffic or because the controlled-access highway does not have two
available adjacent lanes of travel in the same direction on the same side
of the highway where such a stopped motor authorized emergency vehicle or
road assistance vehicle is located, the driver of the approaching or
passing vehicle shall reduce his or her speed, maintain a safe speed with
regard to the location of the stopped motor authorized emergency vehicle
or road assistance vehicle, the weather conditions, the road conditions,
and vehicular or pedestrian traffic, and proceed with due care and
caution or proceed as directed by a peace officer or other authorized
emergency personnel or road assistance personnel.
(c) Any person who violates this subsection is guilty of a traffic
infraction for a first offense and Class IIIA misdemeanor for a second or
subsequent offense.
(2) The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain or
-11-

LB600 LB600
2025 2025
cause to be erected and maintained signs giving notice of subsection (1)
of this section along controlled-access highways.
(3) Enforcement of subsection (1) of this section shall not be
accomplished using simulated situations involving a motor an authorized
emergency vehicle or a road assistance vehicle.
(4) This section does not relieve the driver of any stopped motor an
authorized emergency vehicle or a road assistance vehicle from the duty
to drive with due regard for the safety of all persons using the highway.
(5) For purposes of this section, proper visual signals includes the
hazard lights of a motor vehicle when such hazard lights are flashing.
road assistance vehicle includes a vehicle operated by the Nebraska
Department of Transportation, a Nebraska State Patrol motorist assistance
vehicle, a United States Department of Transportation registered towing
or roadside assistance vehicle, and a utility service vehicle operated by
a utility company. A road assistance vehicle shall emit a warning signal
utilizing properly displayed emergency indicators such as strobe,
rotating, or oscillating lights when stopped along a highway .
Sec. 20. Section 60-3203, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-3203 (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section or in
section 60-3204, the use of an automatic license plate reader system by a
governmental entity is prohibited.
(2) An automatic license plate reader system may be used when such
use is:
(a) By a law enforcement agency of a governmental entity for the
purpose of:
(i) Identifying identifying:
(A) (i) Outstanding parking or traffic violations;
(B) (ii) An unregistered or uninsured vehicle;
(C) (iii) A vehicle in violation of the vehicle equipment
requirements set forth under the Nebraska Rules of the Road;
-12-

LB600 LB600
2025 2025
(D) (iv) A vehicle in violation of any other vehicle registration
requirement;
(E) (v) A vehicle registered to an individual for whom there is an
outstanding warrant;
(F) (vi) A vehicle associated with a missing person;
(G) (vii) A vehicle that has been reported as stolen; or
(H) (viii) A vehicle that is relevant and material to an ongoing
criminal investigation; or
(ii) Enforcing a violation of the maximum lawful speed by means of a
speed control enforcement system as defined in section 4 of this act;
(b) By a parking enforcement entity for regulating the use of a
parking facility;
(c) For the purpose of controlling access to a secured area;
(d) For the purpose of electronic toll collection; or
(e) To assist weighing stations in performing their duties under
section 60-1301.
Sec. 21. If any section in this act or any part of any section is
declared invalid or unconstitutional, the declaration shall not affect
the validity or constitutionality of the remaining portions.
Sec. 22. Original sections 60-696, 60-6,186, 60-6,378, and 60-3203,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 60-601 and 60-605,
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-13-